Missouri, session 2026, SB1403.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 8.016, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 8.016,
to read as follows:
8.016. 1. The commissioner of the office of
administration shall provide each member of the senate and
each member of the house of representatives with a key that
accesses the dome of the state capitol.
2. The commissioner of the office of administration
shall provide each member of the senate and each member of
the house of representatives with a key or key card that
accesses the state capitol. Upon written request by a
member of the senate or house of representatives, the
commissioner of administration shall also provide the
member's spouse or children with a key or key card that
accesses the state capitol.
3. The president pro tem of the senate and the speaker
of the house of representatives shall be responsible for
providing a training program for the members and staff of
the general assembly regarding access to secured areas of
the capitol building. They may consult with the office of

SB 1403 2
administration and department of public safety when
developing such program.
✓